North Carolina, session 2025, HB448.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-164.13 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-164.13. Retail sales and use tax.
The sale at retail and the use, storage, or consumption in this State of the following items are
specifically exempted from the tax imposed by this Article:
…
(76) Equipment designed to prevent unauthorized access to firearms, including (i)
a device that, when installed on a firearm, is designed to prevent the firearm
from being operated without first deactivating the device or (ii) a gun safe,
gun case, lockbox, or other device that is for home use and is designed, in light
of materials used, to prevent access to a firearm by any means other than a
key, a combination, biometric data, or other similar means. The equipment
exempted under this subdivision does not include a glass-faced cabinet or
other form of storage that is primarily designed to allow for the display of
firearms."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to sales made
on or after that date and expires October 1, 2026, for sales made on or after that date.
*H448-v-1*